Hawaii statutes.
§107-26 Hawaii state building codes;
prohibitions. In adopting the Hawaii state building codes, the council
shall not adopt provisions that:

(1) Relate to administrative, permitting, or
enforcement and inspection procedures of each county; or

(2) Conflict with chapters 444 and 464. [L 2007, c 82, pt of §2; am L
2014, c 164, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next